Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.050

Collaboration with Eastern Washington University and local community colleges.

Washington State University and Eastern Washington University shall collaborate with one another and with local community colleges in providing educational pathways and programs to the citizens of the Spokane area.

[ 2004 c 57 s 3; 1991 c 205 s 11; 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 6. Formerly RCW 28B.45.050.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2004 c 57: See RCW 28B.45.012.

Findings—1989 1st ex.s. c 7: See RCW 28B.45.010.